District of Columbia statutes.
1-325.301

Destination DC Marketing Fund.

(a)

There is established as a special fund the Destination DC Marketing Fund (“Fund”), which shall be established under the auspices of and administered by Destination DC, and which shall be used by Destination DC for the purposes of marketing the District.

(b)

The amount of $1.5 million shall be deposited into the Fund from the settlement the District obtained with online travel companies to recover unpaid hotel-room taxes, only upon approval of the settlement by the District of Columbia Court of Appeals, District of Columbia v. Expedia, Inc., et al., Nos. 14-CV-308, 14-CV-309.

(c)

(1)

The money deposited into the Fund, and interest earned, shall not revert to the unrestricted fund balance of the General Fund of the District of Columbia at the end of a fiscal year, or at any other time.

(2)

Subject to authorization in an approved budget and financial plan, any funds appropriated in the Fund shall be continually available without regard to fiscal year limitation.

History

Feb. 26, 2015, D.C. Law 20-155, § 7153, 61 DCR 9990
Oct 22, 2015, D.C. Law 21-36, § 7024(c), 62 DCR 10905

Effect of Amendments

The 2015 amendment by D.C. Law 21-36 substituted “the settlement” for “the $ 60.9 million settlement” in (b).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 days) addition of this part, see § 7163 of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-377, July 14, 2014, 61 DCR 7598, 20 STAT 3696).
For temporary (90 days) addition of this part, see § 7153 of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-449, October 10, 2014, 61 DCR 10915, 20 STAT 4188).
For temporary (90 days) addition of this part, see § 7153 of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Second Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-566, January 9, 2015, 62 DCR 884, 21 STAT 541).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 7016(z)(3) of the Fiscal Year 2016 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2015 (D.C. Act 21-127, July 27, 2015, 62 DCR 10201).